Illinois, session 104th, SB1114.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Radon Resistant Construction Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 52/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Radon 8Resistant Construction Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-953, eff. 6-1-13.)